Utah statutes.
26-6-6.   Duty to report individual suspected of having communicable
disease.
The following shall report to the department or the local health department
regarding any individual suffering from or suspected of having a disease that
is communicable, as required by department rule:
(1)  health care providers as defined in Section 78B-3-403;
(2)  facilities licensed under Title 26, Chapter 21, Health Care Facility
Licensure and Inspection Act;
(3)  health care facilities operated by the federal government;
(4)  mental health facilities;
(5)  care facilities licensed by the Department of Human Services;
(6)  nursing homes and other care facilities;
(7)  dispensaries, clinics, or laboratories that diagnose, test, or otherwise
care for individuals who are suffering from a disease suspected of being
communicable;
(8)  individuals who have knowledge of others who have a communicable disease;
(9)  individuals in charge of schools having responsibility for any
individuals who have a disease suspected of being communicable; and
(10)  child care programs, as defined in Section 26-39-102.
